Alaska, session 34, SB205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 39.35.410(d) is amended to read: 05 (d) The monthly amount of an occupational disability benefit is 40 percent of 06 the disabled employee's gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to 07 disability. For each month of eligibility after the first 12 months, the monthly 08 benefit amount payable to an employee who is a court services officer, a peace 09 officer, or a firefighter at the time of termination is increased to 75 percent of the 10 employee's gross monthly compensation at the time of termination. In this 11 subsection, "court services officer" means an officer assigned to a court by the 12 commissioner of public safety to serve warrants and court orders, provide court 13 security and judicial protection, and transport prisoners. 14 * Sec. 2. AS 39.35.890(d) is amended to read: 01 (d) The monthly amount of an occupational disability benefit is 40 percent of 02 the disabled employee's gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to 03 disability. For each month of eligibility after the first 12 months, the monthly 04 benefit amount payable to an employee who is a court services officer, a peace 05 officer, or a firefighter at the time of termination is increased to 75 percent of the 06 employee's gross monthly compensation at the time of termination. 07 Notwithstanding AS 39.35.790(b), at the time a member is appointed to disability, the 08 member becomes fully vested in the employer contributions made under 09 AS 39.35.750(a). A disabled member is fully vested in the contributions to the 10 member's individual account made under this subsection. An employee is not entitled 11 to elect distributions from the employee's individual contribution account under 12 AS 39.35.810 while the employee is receiving disability benefits under this section. 13 While an employee is receiving disability benefits, based on the disabled employee's 14 gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to disability, the employer 15 shall make contributions both [(1)] to the employee's individual account under 16 AS 39.35.730 on behalf of the employee, without deduction from the employee's 17 disability payments, [;] and [(2)] on behalf of the employee under AS 39.35.750. In 18 this subsection, "court services officer" means an officer assigned to a court by 19 the commissioner of public safety to serve warrants and court orders, provide 20 court security and judicial protection, and transport prisoners. 21 * Sec. 3. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.